District of Columbia statutes.
20-1305

Confirmatory acts.

Nothing in this title shall be deemed to affect the authority of a personal representative to perform ministerial or confirmatory acts after an estate is closed or the appointment of the personal representative is terminated.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-1305.